Maryland, session 2025, HB0477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0477*

HOUSE BILL 477
9.5–305.
(a) For purposes of this subtitle, a child care provider’s own children under the
age of 2 years shall be counted as children served.
(b) (1) In a family child care home:
(i) There may not be more than:
1. 8 children in care at any given time; and
2. [4] 5 children under the age of 2 years; and
(ii) There shall be an adult to child ratio of at least 1 adult to every
[2]:
1. 4 CHILDREN UNDER THE AGE OF 1 YEAR; AND
2. 5 children AT LEAST 1 YEAR OLD AND under the age of 2
years.
(2) (I) In a large family child care home:
[(i)] 1. There may not be more than 12 children in care at any
given time; and
[(ii)] 2. [There] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THERE shall be a limit on the number of children under the age of 2 years
and an adult to child ratio that comply with regulations adopted by the Department under
§ 9.5–303 of this subtitle.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT SET A LIMIT ON THE NUMBER OF CHILDREN UNDER THE
AGE OF 2 YEARS AND THE ADULT TO CHILD RATIO THROUGH REGULATION THAT IS
MORE STRINGENT THAN THE LIMIT AND RATIO FOR A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(c) If the Department determines that the group size provisions of subsection (b)
of this section are unsuitable for a particular family child care home or large family child
care home, the Department may decrease the number of children permitted to be in care at
that family child care home or large family child care home.
9.5–404.
(a) The State Board shall adopt rules and regulations for licensing and operating
child care centers.

HOUSE BILL 477 3
(b) These rules and regulations shall:
(13) Subject to subsection [(c)] (D) of this section, establish probationary
employment qualifications for an individual who is applying for the first time to be a child
care teacher in a child care center in the State that serves preschool or school–age children
who are at least 3 years old.
(C) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL REQUIRE A
CHILD CARE CENTER TO HAVE A RATIO OF AT LEAST 1 ADULT TO EVERY:
(1) 4 CHILDREN UNDER THE AGE OF 1 YEAR; AND
(2) 5 CHILDREN AT LEAST 1 YEAR OLD AND UNDER THE AGE OF 2
YEARS.
[(c)] (D) (1) The probationary employment qualifications established under
subsection (b)(13) of this section shall allow an individual to be employed as a child care
teacher during a probationary period if the individual:
(i) 1. Is enrolled in approved pre–service training;
2. Successfully completes the required 90 hours of the
approved pre–service training within 6 months after being hired; and
3. Holds an associate degree or a bachelor’s degree in:
A. Early childhood education;
B. Elementary education;
C. Child development;
D. Home economics;
E. Nursing;
F. Social work;
G. Special education; or
H. A related field approved by the Department; or
(ii) 1. Is enrolled in approved pre–service training;

HOUSE BILL 477
2. Has successfully completed at least 45 hours of the
approved pre–service training at the time the child care center hires the individual;
3. Successfully completes the remaining hours of the
pre–service training within 6 months after being hired; and
4. Holds an associate degree or a bachelor’s degree in a field
other than a field listed under item (i)3 of this paragraph.
(2) If, at the end of the 6–month probationary period, an individual
described in paragraph (1) of this subsection has not completed the required pre–service
training, the child care center shall, with no further cause, terminate the individual or
reassign the individual to a nonteaching position.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.